Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin USE OF FORCE TRAINING; REIMBURSEMENT.new text end new text begin (a) $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2025 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Office of Higher Education to provide reimbursement grants to postsecondary schools certified to provide programs of professional peace officer education for providing in-service training programs on the use of force, including deadly force, by peace officers. Of this amount, up to ... percent is for administration and monitoring of the program. new text end new text begin (b) To be eligible for reimbursement, training offered by a postsecondary school must: new text end new text begin (1) satisfy the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 626.8452, and be approved by the Board of Peace Officer Standards and Training; new text end new text begin (2) utilize scenario-based training that simulates real-world situations and involves the use of real firearms that fire nonlethal ammunition; new text end new text begin (3) include a block of instruction on the physical and psychological effects of stress before, during, and after a high-risk or traumatic incident and the cumulative impact of stress on the health of officers; new text end new text begin (4) include blocks of instruction on de-escalation methods and tactics, bias motivation, unknown risk training, defensive tactics, and force-on-force training; and new text end new text begin (5) be offered to peace officers at no charge to the peace officer or law enforcement agency. new text end new text begin (c) A postsecondary school that offers training consistent with the requirements of paragraph (b) may apply for reimbursement for the costs of offering the training. Reimbursement shall be made at a rate of $450 for each officer who completes the training. The postsecondary school must submit the name and peace officer license number of the peace officer who received the training to the Office of Higher Education. new text end new text begin (d) As used in this section: new text end new text begin (1) "law enforcement agency" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (f); and new text end new text begin (2) "peace officer" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text end